Nevada, session 83, SB427.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, the sum of
$6,200,000 for:
(a) The planning and design of a new building for the Lee
Business School; and
(b) Security, health and public safety upgrades to the facilities of
the University of Nevada, Las Vegas, campus.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
Sec. 1.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Western Nevada College the sum of $1,133,601 for
improvements to the Jack C. Davis Observatory.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Sec. 1.5. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the College of Southern Nevada the sum of
$300,000 for improvements and extensions to the facilities of the
Northwest Campus, including, without limitation, the Center for
Excellence in Public Safety.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 1.7. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Truckee Meadows Community College the sum of
$3,500,000 for building improvements.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the University of Nevada, Reno, the sum of
$6,200,000 for the planning and design of a life sciences building.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2027, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 17, 2027, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 17, 2027.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2.1. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Great Basin College the sum of $1,913,272 for the
replacement of heating, ventilation or air-conditioning equipment.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2.2. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Great Basin College the sum of $500,000 for
building improvements.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2.3. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to Great Basin College the sum of $2,162,429 for
repairs and maintenance to parking lots and walkways.
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2.4. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Desert Research Institute the sum of $1,200,000
for the installation and maintenance of fire sprinklers.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. Any remaining balance of the appropriation made by
subsection 1 must not be committed for expenditure after June 30,
2029, by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 21, 2029, by either the entity to which the money was
appropriated or the entity to which the money was subsequently
granted or transferred, and must be reverted to the State General
Fund on or before September 21, 2029.
Sec. 2.5. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)